Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1381.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 97WATERBORNE LINE PAINT STANDARDS ON STATE ROADWAYSSec.9701. Definitions.9702. Requirements.§ 9701. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advanced resin technology." A resin-based material certified by the manufacturer for application down to 35 º 123456789101112131415161718 Fahrenheit and having a minimum film formation temperature of less than 40 º Fahrenheit. "Department." The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth."State roadway." An interstate highway or a three-digit or four-digit State route on the non-Federal aid highway system under the jurisdiction of the department.§ 9702. Requirements.(a) Duties of department.--(1) No later than 90 days after the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall require the waterborne paint application on a State roadway of center and edge lines to meet the following requirements:(i) A waterborne paint shall not contain a binder other than advanced resin technology to improve line durability in low-temperature climates.(ii) The thickness of a waterborne paint must be a minimum of 18 mils.(iii) A State roadway more than 16 feet wide must have center and edge lines that are no less than four inches wide when a waterborne paint application is used.(2) A State roadway with a waterborne paint application of center and edge lines must be repainted at least once every 24 months consistent with this subsection.(b) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed as restricting the department from using materials other than waterborne paint for the application of center and edge lines that meet or exceed the minimum requirements under the manual published in accordance with 75 Pa.C.S. § 6121 (relating to uniform system of traffic-control devices).20260SB1381PN1818 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Temporary regulations.--(1) To facilitate the prompt implementation of this section, the department shall issue temporary regulations as may be necessary and appropriate to implement and administer this section.(2) Upon the issuance of the temporary regulations, the department shall transmit notice of the issuance of the temporary regulations to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(3) The temporary regulations shall expire no later than three years following their publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin or upon publication of the final-form regulations, whichever occurs first.(4) The temporary regulations shall be exempt from the following:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(5) The department's authority to adopt temporary regulations under this subsection shall expire three years after the effective date of this paragraph. Regulations 20260SB1381PN1818 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law.(d) Expiration.--(1) If, as a result of a change in the minimum requirements under the Federal Highway Administration's Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways, the department adopts through regulation an update to the minimum requirements specified in the manual published in accordance with 75 Pa.C.S. § 6121 and determines that the updated minimum requirements exceed both the previous minimum requirements and the requirements under this section, the department shall transmit notice of the adoption and determination to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) Upon publication of the notice under paragraph (1), this section shall expire.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1381PN1818 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718